Massachusetts, session 194th, H3621.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after section 18B the following section:-  
Section 18C. No motor vehicle checkpoint which targets a particular type of motor 
vehicle, decoration or adornment of the vehicle or rider, shall be conducted within the 
Commonwealth. This section shall apply only to motor vehicle safety checkpoints targeting the 
general public who are being conveyed by a motor vehicle as defined in section 1, and shall not 
apply to any motor vehicle used as a public or common carrier of persons or property, or to any 
trackless trolley, semi-trailer, tandem unit, or low-speed motor vehicle as defined in said section 
1 for the purposes of conveying construction or commercial goods, or a motor vehicle which 
exceeds the dimensional or weight limits imposed by sections 19 or 19A or by sections 30 or 
30A of chapter 85.